Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Part 1.
General Provisions

§§ 23-15-461 through 23-15-485.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 195, effective from and after July 1, 2017.

§23-15-461. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-301 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-31; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 144; Laws, 2002, ch. 529, § 2, eff July 22, 2002 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.)]

§23-15-463. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-303 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-32; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 145, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-465. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-305 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-33; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 3; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 146, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-467. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-307 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-34; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 147, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-469. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-309 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-35; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 5; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 148, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-471. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-311 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-36; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 6; Laws, 1972, ch. 512, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 149, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-473. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-313 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-37; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 7; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 150, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-475. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-315 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-38; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 8; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 151, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-477. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-317 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-39; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 9; Laws, 1972, ch. 512, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 152, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-479. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-319 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-40; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 10; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 153, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-481. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-321 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-41; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 11; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 154, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-483. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-323 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-42; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 12; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339]; Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 155; Laws, 2002, ch. 529, § 3, eff July 29, 2002 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.)]

§23-15-485. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-325 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-43; Laws, 1966, ch. 609, § 13; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 339]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 156, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]